Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-168.01
Certificate of title; failure to
note required brand or lien; notice to holder of title; corrected certificate
of title; failure of holder to deliver certificate; effect.

The
department, upon receipt of clear and convincing evidence of a failure to
note a required brand or failure to note a lien on a certificate of title,
shall notify the holder of such certificate of title to deliver to the county
clerk or designated county official or the department, within fifteen days
after the date on the notice, such certificate of title to permit the noting
of such brand or lien. After notation, the county clerk or designated county
official or the department shall deliver the corrected certificate of title
to the holder as provided by section 60-152. If a holder fails to deliver
a certificate of title to the county clerk or designated county official or
to the department, within fifteen days after the date on the notice for the
purpose of noting such brand or lien on the certificate of title, the department
shall cancel the certificate of title. This section does not apply when noting
a lien in accordance with subsection (6) of section 60-164.

Laws 2007, LB286, § 17;

Laws 2009, LB202, § 19.